Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1622
Act; how construed.

The Propane Education and Research Act does not preempt or supersede any other program relating to propane safety or education which has been organized and is operating under state law.

Laws 1998, LB 699, § 22.